Maine, session 132, LD1317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 659, §19,
is further amended to read:
A. The Prior to January 1, 2026, the tariff rate for a customer participating in net energy
billing with a distributed generation resource described in this paragraph must equal
the standard-offer service rate established under section 3212 that is applicable to the
customer receiving the credit plus 75% of the effective transmission and distribution
rate for the rate class that includes the smallest commercial customers of the investor-
owned transmission and distribution utility. The tariff rate under this paragraph applies
to net energy billing with a distributed generation resource:
(1) With a nameplate capacity of greater than one megawatt if:
(a) The entity developing the distributed generation resource certifies by
affidavit with accompanying documentation to the commission that the entity,
before September 1, 2022, commenced on-site physical work of a significant
nature on the distributed generation resource and the entity has made and will
continue to make continuous on-site construction efforts to advance toward
completion of the distributed generation resource. For the purpose of this
paragraph, continuous on-site construction efforts include, but are not limited
to, in the context of a solar facility, the continuous installation of racks or other
structures to affix photovoltaic panels, collectors or solar cells to a site. The
commission may share information contained in the affidavit submitted in
accordance with this paragraph with a transmission and distribution utility, as
necessary, to verify a distributed generation resource's compliance with this
section. In administering this subsection, the commission may adopt rules
including, but not limited to, requiring the entity that submits a sworn affidavit
under this subparagraph to provide updated documentation to the commission
after submission of the affidavit; or
(b) The distributed generation resource is collocated with a net energy billing
customer that is or net energy billing customers that are subscribed to at least
50% of the facility's output; or
(2) With a nameplate capacity of one megawatt or less.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A-1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 659, §19,
is amended to read:
A-1. The Prior to January 1, 2026, the tariff rate for a customer participating in net
energy billing under this section with a distributed generation resource not governed
by paragraph A must: equal the standard-offer service rate established pursuant to
section 3212 that was applicable to the rate class of the customer receiving the credit
on December 31, 2020 plus 75% of the effective transmission and distribution rate that
was in effect on December 31, 2020 for the rate class that includes the smallest
commercial customers of the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility and
be increased by 2.25% on January 1, 2023, January 1, 2024 and January 1, 2025.
(1) In 2022, equal the standard-offer service rate established pursuant to section
3212 that was applicable to the rate class of the customer receiving the credit on
Page 1 - 132LR2371(01)

414 December 31, 2020 plus 75% of the effective transmission and distribution rate
425 that was in effect on December 31, 2020 for the rate class that includes the smallest
436 commercial customers of the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility;
447 and
(2) Increase by 2.25% on January 1st of each subsequent year, beginning January
1, 2023.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A-2 is enacted to read:
A-2. Beginning January 1, 2026 and prior to January 1, 2027, the tariff rate for a
customer participating in net energy billing under this section must equal an amount
that is greater than 12¢ per kilowatt-hour but does not exceed the lesser of the tariff
rates applicable in 2025 pursuant to paragraphs A and A-1.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A-3 is enacted to read:
A-3. Beginning January 1, 2027 and prior to January 1, 2028, the tariff rate for a
customer participating in net energy billing under this section must equal an amount
that is greater than 12¢ per kilowatt-hour but does not exceed the tariff rate established
pursuant to paragraph A-2.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, sub-§5, ¶A-4 is enacted to read:
A-4. Beginning January 1, 2028, the tariff rate for a customer participating in net
energy billing under this section must equal 12¢ per kilowatt-hour.